dictionaries/gl_ES/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 111 0 vosllenos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo / acusativo P5 + dativo P3 + dativo / acusativo P4
SFX 111 0 vosllenola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 vosllenolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 vosllenolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 vosllenolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 vosnoslle . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo / acusativo P5 + dativo / acusativo P4 + dativo P3
SFX 111 0 vosnoslla . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 vosnosllas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 vosnosllo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 vosnosllos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 vosnoslles . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo / acusativo P5 + dativo / acusativo P4 + dativo P6
SFX 111 0 vosnosllela . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P4 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 vosnosllelas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P4 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 vosnosllelo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P4 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 vosnosllelos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P4 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 vosllesnos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo / acusativo P5 + dativo P6 + dativo / acusativo P4
SFX 111 0 vosllesnola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 vosllesnolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 vosllesnolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 vosllesnolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P5 + dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 llela . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P6 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 llelas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P6 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 llelo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P6 + acusativo P3
SFX 111 0 llelos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P6 + acusativo P6
SFX 111 0 llesma . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo (P5) solidariedade cortesía P6 + dativo P1 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 llesmas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo (P5) solidariedade cortesía P6 + dativo P1 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 llesmo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo (P5) solidariedade cortesía P6 + dativo P1 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 llesmos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo (P5) solidariedade cortesía P6 + dativo P1 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 llesnos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P6 + dativo / acusativo P4
SFX 111 0 llesnola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 llesnolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 llesnolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 llesnolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 llesvos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P6 + dativo / acusativo P5
SFX 111 0 llesvola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P6 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 llesvolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P6 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 llesvolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P6 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 llesvolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P6 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 112 Y 15
SFX 112 0 me . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P2 transitiva dativo / acusativo P1
SFX 112 0 ma . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P2 transitiva dativo P1 + acusativo P3
SFX 112 0 mas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P2 transitiva dativo P1 + acusativo P3
SFX 112 0 mo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P2 transitiva dativo P1 + acusativo P3
SFX 112 0 mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P2 transitiva dativo P1 + acusativo P3
SFX 112 0 lle . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P2 transitiva dativo P3
SFX 112 0 lla . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P2 transitiva dativo P3 + acusativo P3
SFX 112 0 llas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P2 transitiva dativo P3 + acusativo P3
SFX 112 0 llo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P2 transitiva dativo P3 + acusativo P3
SFX 112 0 llos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P2 transitiva dativo P3 + acusativo P3
SFX 112 s nos mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P2 transitiva dativo / acusativo P4
SFX 112 0 nos [^o]s . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P2 transitiva dativo / acusativo P4
SFX 112 0 nos [^s] . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P2 transitiva dativo / acusativo P4
SFX 112 0 vos . . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P2 transitiva dativo / acusativo P5
SFX 112 0 lles . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P2 transitiva dativo P6
